SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin uyghur.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3992 Y 1
SFX 3992 i urulghanidi i
SFX 4351 Y 1
SFX 4351 a ishimen a
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 l miqi l
SFX 1710 Y 1
SFX 1710 k ligha k
SFX 4989 Y 1
SFX 4989 i uldash i
SFX 3877 Y 1
SFX 3877 q ligha q
SFX 3787 Y 1
SFX 3787 p watqinida p
SFX 2495 Y 1
SFX 2495 i urghanliqi i
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 i uki i
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 i urushmaq i
SFX 1822 Y 1
SFX 1822 p wergen p
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 p watqanda p
SFX 2029 Y 1
SFX 2029 r ndurup r
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 a im a
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 a ishimu a
SFX 3892 Y 1
SFX 3892 a laydighan a
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 a imni a
SFX 3927 Y 1
SFX 3927 e hkimu e
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 a ighuch a
SFX 476 Y 1
SFX 476 m nglargha m
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 l im l
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 m im m
SFX 2831 Y 1
SFX 2831 r shliq r
SFX 1913 Y 1
SFX 1913 n im n
SFX 3445 Y 1
SFX 3445 m nid m
SFX 944 Y 1
SFX 944 p nglargha p
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 o im o
SFX 1899 Y 1
SFX 1899 k ld k
SFX 4112 Y 1
SFX 4112 k laydighan k
SFX 1990 Y 1
SFX 1990 l imni l
SFX 4630 Y 1
SFX 4630 t im t
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 m imni m
SFX 4122 Y 1
SFX 4122 t jigha t
SFX 3682 Y 1
SFX 3682 q ld q
SFX 2561 Y 1
SFX 2561 o imni o
SFX 3323 Y 1
SFX 3323 r ld r
SFX 3839 Y 1
SFX 3839 y nglargha y
SFX 1303 Y 1
SFX 1303 q laydighan q
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 r laydighan r
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 k ydu k
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 a lishish a
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 l ydu l
SFX 2486 Y 1
SFX 2486 m ydu m
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 n ydu n
SFX 2636 Y 1
SFX 2636 d lishish d
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 a liq a
SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 q ydu q
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 r ydu r
SFX 4471 Y 1
SFX 4471 i uralmighan i
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 d liq d
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 s ydu s
SFX 682 Y 1
SFX 682 t ydu t
SFX 4251 Y 1
SFX 4251 a ogha a
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 k lishish k
SFX 4096 Y 1
SFX 4096 i liq i
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 k liq k
SFX 590 Y 1
SFX 590 k mmu k
SFX 4305 Y 1
SFX 4305 d lirinimu d
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 l mmu l
SFX 3093 Y 1
SFX 3093 k yige k
SFX 1299 Y 1
SFX 1299 q lishish q
SFX 4643 Y 1
SFX 4643 a ichilarning a
SFX 2182 Y 1
SFX 2182 r lishish r
SFX 2392 Y 1
SFX 2392 n yige n
SFX 1068 Y 1
SFX 1068 s lishish s
SFX 1755 Y 1
SFX 1755 t lishish t
SFX 2684 Y 1
SFX 2684 a che a
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 q liq q
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 q mmu q
SFX 3234 Y 1
SFX 3234 p walsingiz p
SFX 750 Y 1
SFX 750 r liq r
SFX 1761 Y 1
SFX 1761 a isige a
SFX 437 Y 1
SFX 437 s liq s
SFX 2798 Y 1
SFX 2798 d che d
SFX 4196 Y 1
SFX 4196 n ylishish n
SFX 1259 Y 1
SFX 1259 t liq t
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 a idur a
SFX 2821 Y 1
SFX 2821 a turulush a
SFX 1564 Y 1
SFX 1564 a itishi a
SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97 i che i
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 z liq z
SFX 2396 Y 1
SFX 2396 p wretti p
SFX 4036 Y 1
SFX 4036 a ow a
SFX 3467 Y 1
SFX 3467 s lirinimu s
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 l che l
SFX 2150 Y 1
SFX 2150 i urning i
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 m che m
SFX 4529 Y 1
SFX 4529 m ninglar m
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 n che n
SFX 2792 Y 1
SFX 2792 t dtin t
SFX 3399 Y 1
SFX 3399 i uwalghan i
SFX 611 Y 1
SFX 611 p che p
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 l idur l
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 r che r
SFX 4386 Y 1
SFX 4386 n idur n
SFX 4640 Y 1
SFX 4640 o idur o
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 d rn d
SFX 1240 Y 1
SFX 1240 y che y
SFX 4489 Y 1
SFX 4489 r shturatti r
SFX 3268 Y 1
SFX 3268 d rimiz d
SFX 2229 Y 1
SFX 2229 a uqtin a
SFX 3267 Y 1
SFX 3267 i rimiz i
SFX 1054 Y 1
SFX 1054 a ighinini a
SFX 3410 Y 1
SFX 3410 d shti d
SFX 517 Y 1
SFX 517 a ilash a
SFX 2228 Y 1
SFX 2228 i uqtin i
SFX 3296 Y 1
SFX 3296 l ml l
SFX 4231 Y 1
SFX 4231 r shlarni r
SFX 2488 Y 1
SFX 2488 n yd n
SFX 1781 Y 1
SFX 1781 a uqning a
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 r shti r
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 t shti t
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 a higha a
SFX 4395 Y 1
SFX 4395 a hiwatqan a
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 a ighach a
SFX 2978 Y 1
SFX 2978 d ridiki d
SFX 4735 Y 1
SFX 4735 z shti z
SFX 2317 Y 1
SFX 2317 i uqning i
SFX 1045 Y 1
SFX 1045 i rshi i
SFX 2662 Y 1
SFX 2662 i higha i
SFX 2711 Y 1
SFX 2711 a quchi a
SFX 4097 Y 1
SFX 4097 s linishi s
SFX 4189 Y 1
SFX 4189 i chiliki i
SFX 4242 Y 1
SFX 4242 d rash d
SFX 3962 Y 1
SFX 3962 m chiliki m
SFX 1982 Y 1
SFX 1982 a iringizning a
SFX 3110 Y 1
SFX 3110 r shkimu r
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 a irimizning a
SFX 3145 Y 1
SFX 3145 k mige k
SFX 1903 Y 1
SFX 1903 a ju a
SFX 3009 Y 1
SFX 3009 l mige l
SFX 4498 Y 1
SFX 4498 z sar z
SFX 2913 Y 1
SFX 2913 a ikinimu a
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 i rlmek i
SFX 1072 Y 1
SFX 1072 t ju t
SFX 3259 Y 1
SFX 3259 r shturushning r
SFX 3815 Y 1
SFX 3815 d rliri d
SFX 1471 Y 1
SFX 1471 a ka a
SFX 4265 Y 1
SFX 4265 m nimizni m
SFX 3880 Y 1
SFX 3880 q lghanliqtin q
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 d ka d
SFX 3501 Y 1
SFX 3501 a ishar a
SFX 4284 Y 1
SFX 4284 a misaq a
SFX 4742 Y 1
SFX 4742 i rshtek i
SFX 4026 Y 1
SFX 4026 t rliri t
SFX 3645 Y 1
SFX 3645 m ndim m
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 a sini a
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 q ka q
SFX 4851 Y 1
SFX 4851 r ka r
SFX 1503 Y 1
SFX 1503 i unning i
SFX 1561 Y 1
SFX 1561 s ka s
SFX 1737 Y 1
SFX 1737 d sini d
SFX 1715 Y 1
SFX 1715 t ka t
SFX 1891 Y 1
SFX 1891 r ndim r
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 k ldek k
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 a ishish a
SFX 2589 Y 1
SFX 2589 i chin i
SFX 2356 Y 1
SFX 2356 a iwatidu a
SFX 3795 Y 1
SFX 3795 a tum a
SFX 4754 Y 1
SFX 4754 d ram d
SFX 2025 Y 1
SFX 2025 i rshte i
SFX 3508 Y 1
SFX 3508 a imini a
SFX 601 Y 1
SFX 601 r sini r
SFX 1131 Y 1
SFX 1131 t sini t
SFX 2550 Y 1
SFX 2550 l ishish l
SFX 2331 Y 1
SFX 2331 i rme i
SFX 1524 Y 1
SFX 1524 o ishish o
SFX 4860 Y 1
SFX 4860 m iwatidu m
SFX 4129 Y 1
SFX 4129 q ishish q
SFX 1164 Y 1
SFX 1164 z sini z
SFX 2909 Y 1
SFX 2909 m imini m
SFX 1938 Y 1
SFX 1938 p wlishini p
SFX 1220 Y 1
SFX 1220 m nimiz m
SFX 1382 Y 1
SFX 1382 d shigha d
SFX 213 Y 1
SFX 213 m ngdin m
SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 p ngdin p
SFX 4525 Y 1
SFX 4525 k nlikini k
SFX 699 Y 1
SFX 699 i uratti i
SFX 4987 Y 1
SFX 4987 i ulma i
SFX 1170 Y 1
SFX 1170 y ngdin y
SFX 1873 Y 1
SFX 1873 i ulmaq i
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 r shigha r
SFX 4198 Y 1
SFX 4198 k yelmeydu k
SFX 3416 Y 1
SFX 3416 t shigha t
SFX 2695 Y 1
SFX 2695 i urmaydighan i
SFX 2510 Y 1
SFX 2510 l nt l
SFX 4674 Y 1
SFX 4674 i es i
SFX 1835 Y 1
SFX 1835 m nt m
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 r qliri r
SFX 2678 Y 1
SFX 2678 a erdek a
SFX 1881 Y 1
SFX 1881 s qliri s
SFX 2049 Y 1
SFX 2049 a iman a
SFX 1017 Y 1
SFX 1017 i umning i
SFX 4948 Y 1
SFX 4948 r zl r
SFX 3627 Y 1
SFX 3627 t nt t
SFX 4733 Y 1
SFX 4733 r shturulushi r
SFX 2759 Y 1
SFX 2759 a imizdin a
SFX 1298 Y 1
SFX 1298 a litish a
SFX 4816 Y 1
SFX 4816 d litish d
SFX 2995 Y 1
SFX 2995 l nisa l
SFX 2620 Y 1
SFX 2620 m nisa m
SFX 4182 Y 1
SFX 4182 t digha t
SFX 3333 Y 1
SFX 3333 a ishipla a
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 k litish k
SFX 3269 Y 1
SFX 3269 d rida d
SFX 4541 Y 1
SFX 4541 m ndurush m
SFX 2635 Y 1
SFX 2635 q litish q
SFX 1716 Y 1
SFX 1716 a ishishini a
SFX 956 Y 1
SFX 956 i ch i
SFX 2528 Y 1
SFX 2528 s litish s
SFX 3669 Y 1
SFX 3669 t litish t
SFX 1551 Y 1
SFX 1551 r ndurush r
SFX 3770 Y 1
SFX 3770 l ch l
SFX 4796 Y 1
SFX 4796 l mimiz l
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 m ch m
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 n ch n
SFX 452 Y 1
SFX 452 p ch p
SFX 4559 Y 1
SFX 4559 l manlar l
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 i urulush i
SFX 4955 Y 1
SFX 4955 n ysi n
SFX 390 Y 1
SFX 390 y ch y
SFX 4240 Y 1
SFX 4240 i rgenliki i
SFX 3081 Y 1
SFX 3081 a durushush a
SFX 3280 Y 1
SFX 3280 n pliri n
SFX 415 Y 1
SFX 415 a inishi a
SFX 3020 Y 1
SFX 3020 k lun k
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 p watimiz p
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 n ydin n
SFX 3681 Y 1
SFX 3681 r ldishish r
SFX 1126 Y 1
SFX 1126 p elmeydu p
SFX 4856 Y 1
SFX 4856 a iyalmasliq a
SFX 3987 Y 1
SFX 3987 p watqanliqinimu p
SFX 3159 Y 1
SFX 3159 k lermu k
SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132 k ydighan k
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 l ydighan l
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 a iniwatidu a
SFX 2487 Y 1
SFX 2487 m ydighan m
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 n ydighan n
SFX 269 Y 1
SFX 269 a ir a
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 q ydighan q
SFX 3829 Y 1
SFX 3829 k nliri k
SFX 3679 Y 1
SFX 3679 k lidiken k
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 p wrish p
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 r ydighan r
SFX 2402 Y 1
SFX 2402 i urmaydu i
SFX 4195 Y 1
SFX 4195 r zla r
SFX 2512 Y 1
SFX 2512 l nliri l
SFX 869 Y 1
SFX 869 s ydighan s
SFX 2188 Y 1
SFX 2188 a li a
SFX 3677 Y 1
SFX 3677 k limiz k
SFX 872 Y 1
SFX 872 m nliri m
SFX 1014 Y 1
SFX 1014 t ydighan t
SFX 931 Y 1
SFX 931 d li d
SFX 1837 Y 1
SFX 1837 q nliri q
SFX 2443 Y 1
SFX 2443 q lidiken q
SFX 4772 Y 1
SFX 4772 r nliri r
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 l ir l
SFX 4621 Y 1
SFX 4621 m ir m
SFX 1475 Y 1
SFX 1475 o ir o
SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 k li k
SFX 4561 Y 1
SFX 4561 l mangha l
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 r ir r
SFX 2220 Y 1
SFX 2220 r zliq r
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 q li q
SFX 875 Y 1
SFX 875 r li r
SFX 1469 Y 1
SFX 1469 s li s
SFX 2882 Y 1
SFX 2882 t li t
SFX 4866 Y 1
SFX 4866 a itilidighan a
SFX 4606 Y 1
SFX 4606 a jan a
SFX 4041 Y 1
SFX 4041 k nler k
SFX 3879 Y 1
SFX 3879 z li z
SFX 3097 Y 1
SFX 3097 p wetsun p
SFX 2422 Y 1
SFX 2422 m nler m
SFX 2985 Y 1
SFX 2985 r qchiliq r
SFX 4340 Y 1
SFX 4340 t itliq t
SFX 2240 Y 1
SFX 2240 r shlirigha r
SFX 548 Y 1
SFX 548 a largha a
SFX 3998 Y 1
SFX 3998 i ulmighan i
SFX 4628 Y 1
SFX 4628 a imasliqni a
SFX 3979 Y 1
SFX 3979 k yeleydu k
SFX 2547 Y 1
SFX 2547 t jan t
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 d largha d
SFX 1845 Y 1
SFX 1845 k lmeydu k
SFX 4079 Y 1
SFX 4079 a mayla a
SFX 2297 Y 1
SFX 2297 i gini i
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 k gini k
SFX 1457 Y 1
SFX 1457 l mliri l
SFX 3650 Y 1
SFX 3650 l mlashmaq l
SFX 1330 Y 1
SFX 1330 k largha k
SFX 3750 Y 1
SFX 3750 i esi i
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 p wetmek p
SFX 1326 Y 1
SFX 1326 r lmeydu r
SFX 2126 Y 1
SFX 2126 p gini p
SFX 1264 Y 1
SFX 1264 q largha q
SFX 3164 Y 1
SFX 3164 r largha r
SFX 2177 Y 1
SFX 2177 l mayla l
SFX 2162 Y 1
SFX 2162 d rs d
SFX 829 Y 1
SFX 829 s largha s
SFX 3325 Y 1
SFX 3325 t largha t
SFX 3662 Y 1
SFX 3662 q mayla q
SFX 4732 Y 1
SFX 4732 t side t
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 i ushtiki i
SFX 1672 Y 1
SFX 1672 a ilishi a
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 k mdin k
SFX 4731 Y 1
SFX 4731 z side z
SFX 547 Y 1
SFX 547 l mdin l
SFX 2673 Y 1
SFX 2673 i etler i
SFX 2102 Y 1
SFX 2102 q mdin q
SFX 2432 Y 1
SFX 2432 r mdin r
SFX 702 Y 1
SFX 702 m ngla m
SFX 4077 Y 1
SFX 4077 s mdin s
SFX 1477 Y 1
SFX 1477 e hti e
SFX 840 Y 1
SFX 840 p ngla p
SFX 788 Y 1
SFX 788 r shtrlmek r
SFX 1282 Y 1
SFX 1282 i chilargha i
SFX 4393 Y 1
SFX 4393 i hti i
SFX 3783 Y 1
SFX 3783 p wringlar p
SFX 2385 Y 1
SFX 2385 m chilargha m
SFX 1777 Y 1
SFX 1777 i yi i
SFX 1332 Y 1
SFX 1332 a lanmaq a
SFX 3447 Y 1
SFX 3447 y ngla y
SFX 2579 Y 1
SFX 2579 a ghandin a
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 n yi n
SFX 4721 Y 1
SFX 4721 a uda a
SFX 1628 Y 1
SFX 1628 d ghandin d
SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75 a iship a
SFX 4216 Y 1
SFX 4216 i ulghanidi i
SFX 2180 Y 1
SFX 2180 k lliri k
SFX 3688 Y 1
SFX 3688 k lanmaq k
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 i uda i
SFX 3039 Y 1
SFX 3039 q lanmaq q
SFX 3166 Y 1
SFX 3166 s lanmaq s
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 a ima a
SFX 2808 Y 1
SFX 2808 p wetkenlikini p
SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 l nliq l
SFX 2056 Y 1
SFX 2056 s ghandin s
SFX 824 Y 1
SFX 824 m nliq m
SFX 2751 Y 1
SFX 2751 o iship o
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 t ghandin t
SFX 1087 Y 1
SFX 1087 q nliq q
SFX 3025 Y 1
SFX 3025 k lmu k
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 a ighuchi a
SFX 1183 Y 1
SFX 1183 a himiz a
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 e himiz e
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 a eng a
SFX 4810 Y 1
SFX 4810 k lmisun k
SFX 4652 Y 1
SFX 4652 i himiz i
SFX 854 Y 1
SFX 854 i eng i
SFX 3311 Y 1
SFX 3311 q lmisun q
SFX 4953 Y 1
SFX 4953 r zaq r
SFX 3954 Y 1
SFX 3954 k eng k
SFX 2980 Y 1
SFX 2980 i releydu i
SFX 3755 Y 1
SFX 3755 n eng n
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 i gizgha i
SFX 4218 Y 1
SFX 4218 i ulatti i
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 u eng u
SFX 1154 Y 1
SFX 1154 a iliridiki a
SFX 4124 Y 1
SFX 4124 a iyu a
SFX 4118 Y 1
SFX 4118 q kliri q
SFX 3485 Y 1
SFX 3485 r kliri r
SFX 1309 Y 1
SFX 1309 a ighimu a
SFX 4903 Y 1
SFX 4903 a ighayla a
SFX 1009 Y 1
SFX 1009 a idiken a
SFX 1529 Y 1
SFX 1529 a ighanlarning a
SFX 1502 Y 1
SFX 1502 i uptu i
SFX 3728 Y 1
SFX 3728 d idiken d
SFX 3492 Y 1
SFX 3492 a iwalidighan a
SFX 4911 Y 1
SFX 4911 l idiken l
SFX 3521 Y 1
SFX 3521 m idiken m
SFX 4714 Y 1
SFX 4714 i urulghanliqi i
SFX 4389 Y 1
SFX 4389 o idiken o
SFX 4950 Y 1
SFX 4950 r zimen r
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 a ini a
SFX 3293 Y 1
SFX 3293 l nche l
SFX 1113 Y 1
SFX 1113 m nche m
SFX 1526 Y 1
SFX 1526 d ini d
SFX 4751 Y 1
SFX 4751 i rgchiler i
SFX 3053 Y 1
SFX 3053 e ini e
